Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-120
National Guard; Military Department;
officers; personnel; rank.

The Military Department shall
consist of the Adjutant General in the minimum grade of lieutenant colonel,
one deputy adjutant general with a minimum grade of colonel, or a civilian deputy director, one assistant
director for Nebraska Emergency Management Agency affairs, and such other
officers and enlisted personnel in the number and grade as prescribed by the
United States Department of the Army and Department of the Air Force personnel
documents provided to the National Guard or as otherwise authorized.

Laws 1917, c. 205, § 3, p. 483;

Laws 1919, c. 121, § 1, p. 288;

C.S.1922, § 3304;

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 19, p. 661;

C.S.1929, § 55-124;

R.S.1943, § 55-139;

Laws 1953, c. 188, § 17, p. 598;

Laws 1963, c. 321, § 2, p. 975;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-139;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 18, p. 1587;

Laws 1974, LB 983, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 10;

Laws 2010, LB550, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB806, § 1.

Nebraska National Guard is a state governmental agency when preparing for and holding annual encampment. Nebraska National Guard v. Morgan, 112 Neb. 432, 199 N.W. 557 (1924).